District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.79

Dissolution of corporation — Procedure for filing of statement of intent to dissolve.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 213, ch. 269, § 79
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 20
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.79.
1981 Ed., § 29-379.
1973 Ed., § 29-930c.